Hawaii statutes.
[§431:10C-705] Disclaimers, waiver of
liability, and indemnity agreements invalid. None of the following
agreements between a transportation network company or transportation network
company driver and a passenger shall be valid or enforceable in this State:

(1) A disclaimer of liability of a transportation
network company or transportation network company driver;

(2) A waiver, before the occurrence of an accident,
of any claim or right to file a lawsuit by a passenger against a transportation
network company or transportation network company driver; or

(3) An agreement by the passenger to defend,
indemnify, or hold harmless a transportation network company or transportation
network company driver. [L 2016, c 236, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next